Utah statutes.
34-29-4.   License -- Bond -- Transfer.
Any person licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall pay an annual
license fee in such amount as may be determined by the board of city
commissioners, city council, board of town trustees, or the county legislative
body, and before such license shall be issued shall deposit with the city,
town or county treasurer a bond in the penal sum of $1,000, with two or more
sureties to be approved by the officers designated by ordinance. The bond
shall be made payable to the city, town or county where such business is to be
carried on and shall be conditioned that the person applying for the license
will comply with this chapter and will pay all damages occasioned to any
person by reason of any misstatement, misrepresentation, fraud or deceit of
any person, or by any other violation of this chapter, in carrying on the
business for which a license is granted. If at any time in the opinion of the
officers designated by ordinance to approve such bond, the sureties or any of
them shall become irresponsible, the person holding such license shall, upon
notice from the city, town or county treasurer, give a new bond, to be
approved as hereinafter provided. Failure to give a new bond within 10 days
after such notice shall operate as a revocation of such license, and the
license certificate shall be immediately returned to the city, town or county
treasurer, who shall destroy the same. Licenses granted under this chapter may
be transferred by order of the board of city commissioners, city council,
board of town trustees, or the county executive, but before such transfer
shall be authorized, the applicant for the same shall deposit with the city,
town or county treasurer the sum of $5, which shall be endorsed upon the
application, and the person to whom such license is transferred shall also
deposit such a bond as is required by the applicant for an original license as
hereinbefore prescribed, to be approved in the same manner.
